Utah, session 2026, SB132.
Section 1. Section 52-4-205 is amended to read:52-4-205Effective 05/06/26. Purposes of closed meetings -- Certain issues prohibited in closed meetings.(1)A closed meeting described under Section 52-4-204 may only be held for:(a)except as provided in Subsection (3), discussion of the character, professional competence, or physical or mental health of an individual;(b)strategy sessions to discuss collective bargaining;(c)strategy sessions to discuss pending or reasonably imminent litigation;(d)strategy sessions to discuss the purchase, exchange, or lease of real property, including any form of a water right or water shares, or to discuss a proposed development agreement, project proposal, or financing proposal related to the development of land owned by the state or a political subdivision, if public discussion would:(i)disclose the appraisal or estimated value of the property under consideration; or(ii)prevent the public body from completing the transaction on the best possible terms;(e)strategy sessions to discuss the sale of real property, including any form of a water right or water shares, if:(i)public discussion of the transaction would:(A)disclose the appraisal or estimated value of the property under consideration; or(B)prevent the public body from completing the transaction on the best possible terms;(ii)the public body previously gave public notice that the property would be offered for sale; and(iii)the terms of the sale are publicly disclosed before the public body approves the sale;(f)discussion regarding deployment of security personnel, devices, or systems;(g)investigative proceedings regarding allegations of criminal misconduct;(h)as relates to the Independent Legislative Ethics Commission, conducting business relating to the receipt or review of ethics complaints;(i)as relates to an ethics committee of the Legislature, a purpose permitted under Section 52-4-204;(j)as relates to the Independent Executive Branch Ethics Commission created in Section 63A-14-202, conducting business relating to an ethics complaint;(k)as relates to a county legislative body, discussing commercial information as defined in Section 59-1-404;(l)as relates to the Utah Higher Education Savings Board of Trustees and its appointed board of directors, discussing fiduciary or commercial information;(m)deliberations, not including any information gathering activities, of a public body acting in the capacity of:(i)an evaluation committee under Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code, during the process of evaluating responses to a solicitation, as defined in Section 63G-6a-103;(ii)a protest officer, defined in Section 63G-6a-103, during the process of making a decision on a protest under Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Part 16, Protests; or(iii)a procurement appeals panel under Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code, during the process of deciding an appeal under Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Part 17, Procurement Appeals Board;(n)the purpose of considering information that is designated as a trade secret, as defined in Section 13-24-2, if the public body's consideration of the information is necessary to properly conduct a procurement under Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code;(o)the purpose of discussing information provided to the public body during the procurement process under Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code, if, at the time of the meeting:(i)the information may not, under Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code, be disclosed to a member of the public or to a participant in the procurement process; and(ii)the public body needs to review or discuss the information to properly fulfill its role and responsibilities in the procurement process;(p)as relates to the governing board of a governmental nonprofit corporation, as that term is defined in Section 11-13a-102, the purpose of discussing information that is designated as a trade secret, as that term is defined in Section 13-24-2, if:(i)public knowledge of the discussion would reasonably be expected to result in injury to the owner of the trade secret; and(ii)discussion of the information is necessary for the governing board to properly discharge the board's duties and conduct the board's business;(q)as it relates to the Cannabis Production Establishment Licensing Advisory Board, to review confidential information regarding violations and security requirements in relation to the operation of cannabis production establishments;(r)considering a loan application, if public discussion of the loan application would disclose:(i)nonpublic personal financial information; or(ii)a nonpublic trade secret, as defined in Section 13-24-2, or nonpublic business financial information the disclosure of which would reasonably be expected to result in unfair competitive injury to the person submitting the information;(s)a discussion of the board of the Point of the Mountain State Land Authority, created in Section 11-59-201, regarding a potential tenant of point of the mountain state land, as defined in Section 11-59-102; or(t)a purpose for which a meeting is required to be closed under Subsection (2).; or(u)as it relates to the Spaceport Exploration Committee created in Section 72-10-1302, discussion of the committee with industry experts for the purpose of considering information that is designated as a trade secret, as defined in Section 13-24-2.(2)The following meetings shall be closed:(a)a meeting of the Health and Human Services Interim Committee to review a report described in Subsection 26B-1-506(1)(a), and a response to the report described in Subsection 26B-1-506(2);(b)a meeting of the Child Welfare Legislative Oversight Panel to:(i)review a report described in Subsection 26B-1-506(1)(a), and a response to the report described in Subsection 26B-1-506(2); or(ii)review and discuss an individual case, as described in Section 36-33-103;(c)a meeting of a conservation district as defined in Section 17D-3-102 for the purpose of advising the Natural Resource Conservation Service of the United States Department of Agriculture on a farm improvement project if the discussed information is protected information under federal law;(d)a meeting of the Compassionate Use Board established in Section 26B-1-421 for the purpose of reviewing petitions for a medical cannabis card in accordance with Section 26B-1-421;(e)a meeting of the Colorado River Authority of Utah if:(i)the purpose of the meeting is to discuss an interstate claim to the use of the water in the Colorado River system; and(ii)failing to close the meeting would:(A)reveal the contents of a record classified as protected under Subsection 63G-2-305(81);(B)reveal a legal strategy relating to the state's claim to the use of the water in the Colorado River system;(C)harm the ability of the Colorado River Authority of Utah or river commissioner to negotiate the best terms and conditions regarding the use of water in the Colorado River system; or(D)give an advantage to another state or to the federal government in negotiations regarding the use of water in the Colorado River system;(f)a meeting of the General Regulatory Sandbox Program Advisory Committee if:(i)the purpose of the meeting is to discuss an application for participation in the regulatory sandbox as defined in Section 63N-16-102; and(ii)failing to close the meeting would reveal the contents of a record classified as protected under Subsection 63G-2-305(82);(g)a meeting of a project entity if:(i)the purpose of the meeting is to conduct a strategy session to discuss market conditions relevant to a business decision regarding the value of a project entity asset if the terms of the business decision are publicly disclosed before the decision is finalized and a public discussion would:(A)disclose the appraisal or estimated value of the project entity asset under consideration; or(B)prevent the project entity from completing on the best possible terms a contemplated transaction concerning the project entity asset;(ii)the purpose of the meeting is to discuss a record, the disclosure of which could cause commercial injury to, or confer a competitive advantage upon a potential or actual competitor of, the project entity;(iii)the purpose of the meeting is to discuss a business decision, the disclosure of which could cause commercial injury to, or confer a competitive advantage upon a potential or actual competitor of, the project entity; or(iv)failing to close the meeting would prevent the project entity from getting the best price on the market; and(h)a meeting of the Rules Review and General Oversight Committee to review and discuss:(i)an individual child welfare case as described in Subsection 36-35-102(3)(c); or(ii)information that is subject to a confidentiality agreement as described in Subsection 36-35-102(3)(c).(3)In a closed meeting, a public body may not:(a)interview a person applying to fill an elected position;(b)discuss filling a midterm vacancy or temporary absence governed by Title 20A, Chapter 1, Part 5, Candidate Vacancy and Vacancy and Temporary Absence in Elected Office; or(c)discuss the character, professional competence, or physical or mental health of the person whose name was submitted for consideration to fill a midterm vacancy or temporary absence governed by Title 20A, Chapter 1, Part 5, Candidate Vacancy and Vacancy and Temporary Absence in Elected Office.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 72-10-1301 is amended to read:72-10-1301Effective 05/06/26Repealed 07/01/27. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)"Committee" means the Spaceport Exploration Committee created in Section 72-10-1302.(2)"Spaceport feasibility study" means a study to determine the feasibility of establishing a spaceport and that includes:(a)a market analysis that evaluates the demand for space launch services, including potential government, commercial, and international customers and competitors;(b)an economic impact assessment that analyzes the projected economic benefits of developing a spaceport, including job creation, local business growth, revenue generation, and an analysis of projected customers that could use the spaceport;(c)a business case that describes how the spaceport could meet customer needs and attract private financing for the spaceport;(d)detailed cost estimates for construction, operation, and maintenance of a spaceport, including infrastructure, technology, and human resources;(e)consideration of the activities at the spaceport that the committee identifies the spaceport should support; and(f)in consultation with the Utah National Guard and the Utah Test and Training Range, an assessment of opportunities to leverage military airspace and infrastructure and uses the military might have for a spaceport.(3)"Spaceport siting assessment" means an assessment that is informed by the results of a spaceport feasibility study to determine potential locations for a spaceport that includes an analysis of:(a)the extent to which the site can accomplish the spaceport objectives that the committee identifies;(b)geographic and environmental considerations, including the site's size, location, and environmental impact;(c)whether the site is remote enough to minimize risk to populated areas and complies with environmental regulations;(d)infrastructure needs, including existing infrastructure and upgrades needed to support spaceport resources including launchpads, control centers, roads, utilities, and facilities;(e)potential sources of significant infrastructure upgrades;(f)accessibility, including consideration for the site's accessibility for transportation and logistics;(g)connections to major highways, airports, and ports;(h)regulatory compliance with applicable federal law, including regulations from the Federal Aviation Administration and Environmental Protection Agency;(i)resources the state may leverage for a particular site, including tax benefits, land ownership, land use authority, and regulatory benefits;(j)whether the site preserves the viability of the Utah Test and Training Range and all Department of Defense missions in the state;(k)the existing uses and needs of Utah airspace, including for an international airport in a county of the first class; and(l)activities that the committee identifies that the spaceport should support.(4)"Supported activities" means the types of activities that could occur at a spaceport including:(a)satellite launches;(b)scientific missions;(c)national defense missions;(d)commercial space flights;(e)space exploration;(f)reentry operations;(f)(g)space cargo and resupply missions;(g)(h)space tourism; and(h)(i)space industry research and development.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 72-10-1303 is amended to read:72-10-1303Effective 05/06/26Repealed 07/01/27. Spaceport Exploration Committee duties.(1)The committee shall:(a)establish key objectives that the state should pursue in establishing a spaceport;(b)evaluate the supported activities that would be most feasible for a spaceport in the state;(c)conduct a spaceport feasibility study;(d)conduct a spaceport siting assessment;(e)evaluate the advantages and disadvantages the state has in establishing a spaceport; and(f)make recommendations to the Legislature regarding whether it is in the state's best interest to establish a spaceport.(2)The committee may:(a)authorize the department to contract with one or more consultants to perform research, analysis, and legal work, or to provide other assistance necessary to accomplish the committee's duties;(b)establish any advisory committees or working groups needed to fulfill the committee's responsibilities;(c)by majority vote, add up to three non-voting committee members; and(d)appoint one or more working groups to advise and assist the committee.(3)The committee shall:(a)create a report that:(i)details the committee's conclusions on the items described in Subsection (1); and(ii)includes recommendations on legislation needed to implement the committee's conclusions; and(b)report to the Economic Development and Workforce Services Interim Committee and the Transportation Interim Committee no later than SeptemberNovember 30, 2026.

Section 4:
Section 4.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.